internal_storage/hyphen_dictionaries/hyph_la_classical.dic
UTF-8
LEFTHYPHENMIN 2
RIGHTHYPHENMIN 2
.a1b1
.2aba2
.ab3a4u
.a3b3a4v
.ab3á1u
.2abá
.ab3á1v
.abe4
.ab3e2s
.2abé2
.ab3é2s
.abi2
.ab3i4n
.ab3is
.2ab3i1t
.ab1i4u
.ab1i4v
.1ab1ī2
.abī4n
.abī2́4
.abí2
.ab3í4n
.ab3ís
.abí4t
.2ab1o2
.2abó2
.a3b5u4s
.2ab3ú
.ad3ā
.a1d1
.ad3á
.adǣ2́4
.adǣ2
.adǽ2
.ade4
.ad3e4s
.ad3ē2
.adē2́4
.adé2
.ad3é1r
.ad3é2s
.ad3i1b2
.ad3i4c
.ad3ie
.ad3ié
.adi4m
.ad5i4n
.ad3i4q
.ad3is
.ad5i4t
.adi4u
.ad3i4v
.ad3ī4
.adī2́4
.adí4c
.adí4m
.ad3í4n
.ad3í4q
.ad3ís
.adí4t
.ad3í4u2
.ad3í4v
.ad6ora.
.a2do2
.ado1ra
.ad6or2a1ne
.ad6or2a1q
.ad6ora5ue.
.adora1u
.ador2a3u2e1
.ad6ora5ve.
.ador2a1v
.adora3ve1
.ad5ṓro
.adō2
.ad2ō2́
.adṓ1r
.ad5ṓ6rō
.ad6ó6ra.
.adó1r
.adó1ra
.adó4ro
.adú2
.2ae2a
.ae1
.2ae2ă3
.ae4s1t
.ae5t2e
.a2e1t
.a2g2n2
.a1g
.a1ī3b2
.aī́3b2
.aī2́
.aí2
.a1í3b
.am4b3ē
.1a2m1b
.am4bi.
.am4b5i4n
.am4b5i4q
.am6b5is.
.am6b5i2s1n2
.am6b5i2s3q
.am6b5is1u
.am6b5i2s1v
.am2bi6u2e1
.amb1iu
.am6b6i6ui.
.ambi1ui
.am4b6i4u2i1n
.am4b6i4ui1q
.amb6iuiu2
.amb6iuín
.am2bi2u2í
.amb6iuí1q
.amb6iuí1u2
.am4bi6ve1
.amb1i1v
.am6b6i6vi.
.ambiv2i
.am4b6i4vi1n
.am4b6i4vi1q
.am4b6i4vi1v
.amb6ivín
.am2bi2ví
.amb6iví1q
.amb6i1ví1v
.ambī4n
.am2b1ī2
.ambī́6n
.ambī2́2
.am4b5í4n
.amb1í
.am4bí4q
.am4b5ís
.am6bí6u2e1
.ambí1u2
.am6bí6ve1
.ambí1v
.am4b3ú
.an6t5ea.
.a2n1t
.an3t2e
.ante1a
.ant2e5i4
.ant2e5í4
.as4c2e
.as1c
.as4c2é
.as4t2a
.as1t
.as4tá
.as4t2e
.as4té
.as4t2o
.as4t2ō
.as4tó
.as6tra1r
.2ast2r2
.as6tr2a1t
.as4t1rā
.as6trá1r
.ast1r2á
.as6tr2á2s3
.as4tru
.as4trū1
.at2e2
.2a1t
.at2ē2
.2a͞e4ă
.a2͞
.a͞e1
.a͞e4s5t
.2a͡e4ă
.a2͡
.a͡e1
.a͡e4s5t
.á͡e4s5
.á͡2
.ā1g2
.2ā2́2
.ā́1g2
.ā́4l
.ā́4t
.2ăbă2
.ă1b1
.ăbă4u
.ăbă4v
.ăbĕ4
.ăbĕ2́4
.ăb1ī2
.ăbī4q
.ăbī2́4
.ăbĭ2
.ăb3ĭ1t
.ăbĭ2́4
.ăbŏ2́4
.ăbŏ2
.ăd3ā
.ă1d1
.ăd3á
.ădæ4
.ădǣ4
.ădǣ2́4
.ădǽ4
.ăd3ē2
.ădē2́4
.ădĕ4
.ădĕ2́4
.ăd3ī4
.ădī2́4
.ăd3ĭē
.ăd3ĭĕ
.ăd3ĭī
.ădĭ4m
.ăd3ĭ4t
.ădĭ́4t
.ădĭ2́
.ăd5ṓ6rō
.ădō2
.ăd2ō2́
.ădṓ1r
.ăd5ṓrŏ
.ăd3ŭ́2
.ădŭ2
.ă1ī3b2
.ăī́3b2
.ăī2́
.ăm4b3ē
.1ă2m1b
.ămbī4q
.ăm2b1ī2
.ămbī́6q
.ămbī2́2
.ăm4b5ŭ́2
.ăm3bŭ
.ă4s4pĭ
.ă2s1p2
.ăs4t2ă
.2ăs1t
.ăs4t2ĭ
.ăs4t2ō
.ăs4t1rā
.4ăst2r2
.ăs4trū1
.ắ2
.ắb5ă4u
.ắb2ă
.ắ1b
.ắb5ă4v
.ắb3ĕ4
.ắbĭ4
.ắb5ĭ1t
.ắb3ŏ1
.ắ4c
.ắd3ē1
.ắ1d
.ắd3ĕ4
.ắd3ī
.ắd5ĭē
.ắd2ĭ
.ắd5ĭī
.ắd5ĭ4t
.ắ4g
.ắ4ĭ
.ắ4l
.ắ4r
.ắ4s
.ắs4t2ā
.ắs1t
.ắs4t2ă
.ắs4t2ĕ
.ắs4t2ō
.2ắ4t
.á1b1
.ába2
.áb3a4u
.á3b3a4v
.áb3e4
.ábi2
.áb3is
.áb3i1t
.áb3o
.á1d1
.áde2
.ád3e1s
.ád3ē1
.ádi2
.ád3ie
.ád3is
.ád3i1t
.ád3ī
.áes3
.áes5t
.ág4ni1t
.á2g1n2
.á1g
.ág1ni
.ám4bi.
.ám1
.1á2m1b
.ám4b5is
.án4ter
.á2n1t
.án3t2e
.ás4t2a
.2ás
.ás1t
.ás4t2ā
.ás4t2e
.ás4t2o
.ás4t2ō
.ás4tru
.ást2r2
.æs3t2
.æ1
.ǣs3t2
.ǣ1
.ǣ2́2
.ǣ́4q
.ǣ́s3
.ǽs3
.ǽ1
.ba3g
.1b
.ba6ia3ne.
.ba3i4an
.bai2a
.bai2a1ne
.ba6iá3ne.
.ba3ián
.bai2á
.bai4á1ne
.ba4i2i
.ba4i2ī
.b2ā2́3
.bá4i2ī
.bi3
.bĭ1
.b1ĭ3ĕ
.ca2i
.1c
.c2a
.cá2i
.ce2n3s
.c2e
.cē2n3s
.ci6s5t2a
.c2i
.ci4s3t
.ci6s5té
.c2o3i4
.c2o3í4
.com5ē4s
.com1
.co2m1ē
.com5ḗ4s
.comē2́
.co4mé4s
.co1mé
.1co4n5i4c
.3con1
.c2o1ni
.1co4ní4c
.c2o1ní
.cŏ3ĭ2
.cŏm5ē4s
.cŏ2m1
.cŏ1m1ē
.cŏm5ḗ4s
.cŏmē2́
.cŏ1m3ĕ2
.1cŏ4n5ĭ4c
.cŏ1nĭ
.1cŏ6n5ĭ́6c
.cŏnĭ2́
.cŏ́3ĭ2
.3cŏ2́
.cŏ́4m3
.cŏ́1m2ĭ4
.1cŏ́6n5ĭ6c
.cŏ́1nĭ
.có3i2
.có4mi1t
.có1m
.có1m2i
.cómi6t2e
.1có4n5i4c
.c2ó1n
.có1ni
.1de3d2
.1d
.de4m2e1t
.de1m
.de1me
.de1s2
.de5u4t2a
.de1u
.d2e2u1t
.de5u4tá
.de5utí
.dēs2
.dē1
.dē3s1c
.d1ē3s2ú
.d2ḗ3i
.dē2́
.d3ḗ5s2um
.dḗ2s1u
.dĕ1
.1dĕ3d2
.dĕ3ŏ
.dé3s2
.di3gé
.di1g
.di4r5e4m
.di1re
.di4r5é4m
.di1ré
.dis6cendam
.d2i2s1c
.disc2e
.1disc2e2n3d2
.dis6cend2as3
.dis6cendám1
.discend2á
.dis6cend2ás3
.dis6cendi
.dis6cendí
.dis6cendo.
.discen3do
.dis6cend2on
.dis6cend2o1q
.dis6cend2o3u2
.dis6cend2o3v
.dis6cend2ó1n
.dis6cend2ó1q
.dis6cend2ó1u2
.dis6cend2ó1v
.dis6céndam
.disc2é
.disc2én
.1discé2n1d2
.dis6cénd2as3
.dis6cénd2e
.dis6céndi
.dis6céndo.
.discén3do
.di5s6ta1u
.dis1t
.dist2a
.di5s6t2a1v
.di3s4tá
.di5s4tī
.dī1
.dīs4t
.dĭ5s4t2ă
.d2ĭs
.dĭs1t
.dĭ5s4tī
.do3l
.dó3l2
.e1d2
.ed4i
.ed4o
.ed4u
.2e1i2
.e1r2e
.e2r1e5x4
.et3i
.2e1t
.ex3ā
.e1x1
.ex3á
.ex3é1q
.ex2é
.ex3i4
.ex3ī4
.exī2́4
.ex3í4
.ex5ṓ1r
.exō2
.e3x2ō2́
.ex3ó1n
.ex3u4
.exū2
.exū2́4
.exú2
.ēs3t2ĭ
.ēs1t
.ē2́2
.ĕ1d2
.ĕd4ĭ
.ĕt3ĭ
.ĕ1t
.ĕx3ā
.ĕ1x1
.ĕx3ī4
.ĕxī2́4
.ĕx3ĭ2
.ĕxĭ2́4
.ĕx5ṓ1r
.ĕxō2
.ĕ3x2ō2́
.ĕxū2
.ĕxū2́4
.ĕx3ŭ2
.ĕ2́2
.ĕ́4c
.ĕ́4q
.2ĕ́4t
.ĕ́3t3ĭ
.ĕ́x3ī
.ĕ́1x1
.ĕ́x3ĭ4
.ĕ́x3ŭ2
.ét3e2
.2é1t
.ét3i
.éx3e1q
.é1x1
.éx2e1
.éx3i2
.éx3u2
.gé1
.1g
.he1m2i3
.h2e
.he1m
.hē2́3
.h2ē
.hi6s5t2e
.h2i
.hi4s3t
.hi6st2r2
.hĭ6s5t2ĕ
.hĭ4s1t
.h2ĭs
.ho4s
.h2o
.ibe3
.i1b2
.i3d3eo
.2i3d2e
.i1d
.id3eō
.2i3d3í
.id3u2e1
.2i3d2u
.ie3s1u
.ie2s
.ié3s1u
.ié2s
.i1g2
.i2g3ne
.i2g1n2
.ig3ni
.ig3nī
.ig3ní
.i1n1
.i1n3a4
.i1n3ā4
.in2ā2́4
.i1ná4
.2i3n3e4
.i1nē2
.inē2́4
.i3n3é2
.i1n3i4
.i1nī4
.inī2́4
.i1n3í4
.2i3n3o4
.2i3nó4
.i2n3t
.inte6r2e6ri
.in5ter
.in3t2e
.inte1re
.inte6r2e6rí
.inte6res
.inte6rés
.int2e1ré
.int2e6ri.
.interi4
.int2e6r4i1q
.inte6r2is
.int2e6rí6n
.inte1rí
.int2e6r2í6q
.inte6r2ís
.in1te6r2í6t
.inté6r2e6ri
.inté1r
.int2ére
.inté6ri6t2e
.in1téri1t
.inté6r2i6t2i
.inté6ri6to.
.intérit2o
.inté6ri6t2ō
.in3u4d
.1in1u2
.in3u2e1
.i1n3ui
.in3u2ī
.i1n3u2í
.2i3n3u2s
.inū2́4
.i1n1ū2
.inú4d
.i1nú
.2io3s4
.io1
.io5s1u
.2ió3s2
.is5t2a
.is1t
.is5t2ā
.is5t2e
.i2s5t2i
.i2s5tí
.is3t2r2
.ī2́2
.ī́4b2
.ī́4m2
.ī́4n
.ī́4q
.ī́4t
.ĭd3ĕ2ō
.2ĭ1d
.ĭ3d2ĕ
.ĭ1g2
.ĭg3nĕ
.ĭ2g1n2
.ĭg3nī
.ĭn1
.ĭ1n3ā4
.ĭn2ā2́4
.ĭnē2́4
.ĭ1nē
.2ĭ3nĕ4
.ĭnĕ2́4
.2ĭ1nī4
.ĭnī2́4
.ĭ1n3ĭ2
.ĭnĭ2́4
.ĭntĕ6r2ĭt.
.3ĭnt2ĕ
.ĭ2n1t
.ĭntĕ1rĭ
.ĭn1tĕr2ĭ1t
.ĭnt2ĕ6rĭ6t2ĕ
.ĭntĕ6rĭ2t1n
.ĭntĕ6rĭ6tō.
.ĭntĕrĭt2ō
.ĭntĕ6rĭ6tōn
.ĭntĕ6rĭ6t2ō1q
.ĭntĕ6rĭ6t2ō1u
.ĭntĕ6rĭ6t2ō1v
.ĭntĕ6rĭ6tṓn
.ĭntĕrĭt2ō2́
.ĭntĕ6rĭ6tṓ1q
.ĭntĕ6rĭ6tṓ1u
.ĭntĕ6rĭ6tṓ1v
.ĭntĕ6rĭ2t1q
.ĭntĕ6rĭ2tu
.ĭntĕ6rĭ2t1v
.ĭn1tĕ6rĭ́6t
.ĭntĕrĭ2́
.ĭntĕ́6rĕ6rĭ
.ĭntĕ2́
.ĭntĕ́1r
.ĭntĕ́r2ĕr
.ĭnt2ĕ́6rĭ6t2ĕ
.ĭntĕ́1rĭ
.ĭn1tĕ́r2ĭ1t
.ĭntĕ́6rĭ6t2ō
.ĭnū2́4
.ĭ1n1ū2
.ĭn3ŭ2s
.1ĭ1nŭ
.ĭs5t2ā
.2ĭs
.ĭs1t
.ĭs5t2ă
.ĭs5t2ĕ
.ĭs5t2ĭ
.ĭ2́2
.ĭ́d5ĕ2ō
.2ĭ́1d
.ĭ́4n
.ĭ́1n3ĕ4
.ĭ́1n3ĭ4
.ĭ́n5ŭĕ
.ĭ́1n2ŭ
.ĭ́n5ŭī
.ĭ́n5ŭō
.í3d3eo
.2í1d
.í3d2e
.íd3eō
.íd3u2e1
.íd2u
.ín1
.2í1n3e2
.í1n3i2
.í2n3t
.í1n3ui
.í1nu
.jo3s4
.1j
.jo1
.jo5s1u
.jó3s2
.li4g5n2
.1l
.l2i
.li1g
.lí2g3n2
.lí1g
.lí3t
.ma3g2e
.ma1g
.magn2æ6u2
.ma4g3n2
.mag1næ1
.magn2æ6v
.magnǣ6u2
.mag1nǣ1
.magnǣ6v
.magnǣ́6u
.magnǣ2́
.magnǣ́6v
.magnǽ6u2
.mag1nǽ1
.magnǽ6v
.mă3g2ĕ
.m1ă1g
.măgn2æ6u2
.mă2g1n2
.măg1næ1
.măgn2æ6v
.măgnǣ6u2
.măg1nǣ1
.măgnǣ6v
.măgnǣ́6u
.măgnǣ2́
.măgnǣ́6v
.măgnǽ6u2
.măg1nǽ1
.măgnǽ6v
.mĕ3ĭ
.1mĕ
.mi6s5t2a
.1mi
.m2is
.mis1t
.ne3q
.1ne
.ne3s
.ne5s4c
.ne5ut2e
.ne1u
.n2e2u1t
.ne5uté
.ne5u4t2i
.ne3xo2
.n1e1x1
.ne3xō2
.nē2́3
.1nē
.nĕ3xō2
.1nĕ
.n1ĕ1x1
.né3s2
.1né
.né5ut2e3
.n2éu
.néu1t
.no6s5t2e
.1no
.n2os
.n2os3t
.nŏ6st2ĕ
.1nŏ
.nŏs1t
.n3u3d
.n1ū3d2
.1nū1
.ob3a2
.1o1b1
.obe4r
.ob3e2s
.ob3é2
.obi2
.ob3i2ī
.ob3i4n
.ob3i1q
.ob3is
.o2b1i4u
.ob1i4v
.ob3ī4
.obī2́4
.obí4
.ob3ín
.ob3í1q
.ob3ís
.o2b1o2
.ob3ō
.obó4r
.ob3u
.oc4té
.o1c
.o2c1t
.2os3t
.2ō2́2
.ṓ4l
.ṓ4s
.2ŏb3ī4
.1ŏ1b1
.ŏbī2́4
.ŏb3ĭī
.ŏbĭ2
.ŏb3ō
.ŏc4t3ĕ
.ŏ1c
.ŏ2c1t
.ŏ2́2
.ŏ́b3ĕ
.ŏ́1b
.ŏ́b3ĭ2
.ŏ́4l
.ŏ́4p
.ób3i
.ó1b1
.œ́2
.pa4r5ui
.1p
.p2a
.par2u
.pa1r
.pa4r5u2í
.pā2r3
.p2ā
.pá4r1ui
.p2á
.pá1r
.p2áru
.pera4
.p2e
.per1
.pe4r5an
.per5a1r
.peras5
.pe4rā
.per5ā1r
.pe6r2áe3q
.pe1r2á
.peræ4q
.per1æ2
.per2ǣ2́4
.per1ǣ2
.per5ǣ́1q
.pe4rǽ4q
.pe1rǽ1
.pe2re4
.per5e1m
.pe4r5e4s
.p2e4r5ē4
.perē2́4
.p2e1ré4
.pe4r5ém
.pe4r5é4s
.p2e4ri.
.pe6rie2ns
.p2erie
.pe3r2ien
.per6i2e3re.
.per3ie1r
.perie3r2e
.per6ie3r2e1ne
.peri2eren
.per6i2ere1q
.per6i2ere1u
.per6i2ere1v
.per6ie1r2is
.per6ier2ís
.perie1rí
.per6i2ēn
.per6i2ē3re
.per3iē1r2
.per6i2ḗn
.periē2́
.per6iḗr2e
.peri2ḗ1r
.per6i2ére
.p2erié
.per3ié1r
.pe5rill2e
.per1i1l
.peri2l1l2
.pe5r6ill2i
.pe5rillí
.pe5ri3mi1n
.peri1m
.peri1m2i
.per6imi1n2i
.per6imi1ní
.per5imu
.pe5r6i3m2ur
.per4i6m2us
.pe5ri3múr1
.per2i1mú
.per5i6m2ús
.p2eri4n
.per5i3ne
.p2e4r5i4q
.per6i6re.
.per3i3r4e
.peri6r2em.
.perire1m
.pe5r6ir6e1m2i
.peri6re2m1n2
.peri6r2e2m1q
.peri6re2m1u2e1
.perir2emu
.pe5r6ire1m2ur
.peri6re1m2us
.pe5r6iremúr1
.perir2e1mú
.peri6rem2ús
.peri6r2e2m1v2
.per6i6r2e1ne
.peri6rent.
.perir2e2n1t
.peri6ren2t1n
.peri6ren2t1q
.peri6ren2t1u2e1
.pe5r6irentur
.pe5r6irentú
.peri6ren2t1v
.per6i6re1q
.pe5r6irer
.peri6res
.peri6r2e1t
.per6ire3tur
.per6ire3tú
.per6i6re1u
.per6i6re1v
.pe5r6iré1m2i
.per3i1ré
.peri6r2é2m1n2
.peri6r2é2m1q
.peri6ré2m1u2e1
.perir2ému
.pe5r6iré1m2ur
.peri6ré1m2us
.peri6r2é2m1v2
.peri6rén2t1n
.perir2én
.periré2n1t
.peri6rén2t1q
.peri6rén2t1u2e1
.pe5r6iréntur
.peri6rén2t1v
.pe5r6ir2é1r
.peri6rés
.peri6r2é1t
.per6irétur
.pe5r6i1r2i
.pe5r6i1rí
.pe6r2is.
.pe1r2is
.pe6r2i2s1n2
.pe6r2i2s3q
.pe6r5isse.
.peri2s1s2
.peris3se
.pe6r5is3se1m
.pe6r5iss2en
.pe6r5iss2e3q
.pe6r5is3ses
.pe6r5iss2e1t
.pe6r5iss2e3u2e1
.perisse1u
.pe6r5iss2e1v
.pe6r5is3sém
.peris3s2é
.pe6r5iss2én
.pe6r5is3sés
.pe6r5iss2é1t
.pe6r5i2s5t2i
.peris1t
.pe6r5i2stí
.pe6r2is1u
.pe6r2i2s1v
.per5it.
.peri1t
.per2i6t2a
.peri6t2ā
.per2i6tá
.per6i6t2æ1
.per6i6tǽ1
.per6i6t2e
.peri6ti.
.per2it2i
.peri6ti1n
.peri6ti3q
.peri6t2is.
.periti2s
.peri6t2i2s1n2
.peri6t2i2s3q
.peri6t2is1u
.peri6t2i2s1v
.peri6ti1u2e1
.peri6ti1v
.peri6tín
.per2ití
.peri6tí3q
.peri6tí2s1n2
.perit2í2s
.peri6tís3q
.peri6tís3u
.peri6tí2s1v
.peri6tí1u2
.peri6tí1v
.per5i2t1n
.per6i6to.
.perit2o
.per6i6ton
.per6i6t2o1q
.per6itor
.pe5rit2or.
.pe5rito2r1n2
.pe5rit2o2r1q
.pe5rito2r1u2e1
.perit2o1ru
.peri6to3r2um
.peri6t2o3rú
.pe5rit2o2r1v2
.per6i6tos
.peri6to1t
.per6i6t2o1u2
.per6i6t2o1v
.per6i6t2ó1n
.per6i6t2ó1q
.per6itór
.pe5ritó2r1n2
.pe5rit2ó2r1q
.pe5ritó2r1u2e1
.perit2óru
.peri6tó1r2um
.pe5rit2ó2r1v2
.per6i6tós
.peri6tó1t
.per6i6t2ó1u2
.per6i6t2ó1v
.per5i2t1q
.per6i6tu
.per7i6t1u2e1
.peri6tū1
.per6i6tú
.per5i2t1v
.p2eri4u
.per7i1u2e1
.p2er5i4v
.pe4rī.
.p2e1rī
.pe6r5ī6m2us
.per2ī1m
.pe6r5ī6m2ús
.perī1mú
.pe2r5ī4n
.pe4r5ī4q
.pe6r6ī6re.
.per3ī1r
.pe6rī6re1m
.pe6r6ī6r2e1ne
.pe6rī6rent.
.perīr2e2n1t
.pe6rī6ren2t1n
.pe6rī6ren2t1q
.pe6rī6ren2t1u2e1
.per6īrentur
.per6īrentú
.pe6rī6ren2t1v
.pe6r6ī6re1q
.per6īrer
.pe6rī6r2e1t
.pe6r6ī6re1u
.pe6r6ī6re1v
.per6īrē1m2i1
.perī1rē
.perīrē1m
.per6īrē1m2ur
.perīr2ēmu
.pe6rī6rē1m2us
.per6īrēmúr1
.perīr2ē1mú
.pe6rī6rēm2ús
.per6īrē1r2
.pe6rī6rēs
.pe6rī6r2ē1t
.per6īrētu
.per6īrētú
.per6īrḗ1mi
.perīrē2́
.perīrḗ1m
.per6īrḗ1m2ur
.perīr2ḗmu
.pe6rī6rḗ1m2us
.per6īr2ḗ1r
.pe6rī6rḗs
.pe6rī6r2ḗ1t
.per6īrḗtu
.pe6rī6rém
.perī1ré
.pe6rī6rén2t1n
.perīr2én
.perīré2n1t
.pe6rī6rén2t1q
.pe6rī6rén2t1u2e1
.per6īréntur
.pe6rī6rén2t1v
.per6īr2é1r
.pe6rī6r2é1t
.per6īri
.per6īrī
.per6ī1rí
.pe4r5īs
.pe6rī6t2e
.per2ī1t
.pe6r5ī6t2is.
.perīt2i
.perīti2s
.pe6r5ī6t2i2s1n2
.pe6r5ī6t2i2s3q
.pe6r5ī6t2is1u
.pe6r5ī6t2i2s1v
.pe6r5ī6tí2s1n2
.perīt2í2s
.pe6r5ī6tís3q
.pe6r5ī6tís3u
.pe6r5ī6tí2s1v
.pe6rī6tō.
.perīt2ō
.pe6rī6tōn
.pe6rī6t2ō1q
.pe6r5ī6tō1t2
.pe6rī6t2ō1u
.pe6rī6t2ō1v
.pe6rī6tṓn
.perīt2ō2́
.pe6rī6tṓ1q
.pe6r5ī6tṓ1t
.pe6rī6tṓ1u
.pe6rī6tṓ1v
.pe6rī6tur
.pe6rī6túr1
.pe4r5ī4u2
.pe4r5ī4v
.pe6r5ī́6m2us
.per2ī́1m2
.perī2́
.pe6r5ī́6n
.pe6r5ī́6q
.pe6r6ī́6re.
.per3ī́1r
.perī́r2e
.pe6rī́6re1m
.pe6rī́6ren
.per6ī́r2e1ne
.pe6r6ī́6re1q
.per6ī́rer
.pe6rī́6r2e1t
.pe6r6ī́6re1u
.pe6r6ī́6re1v
.pe6rī́6rē
.per6ī́ri
.per6ī́rī
.pe6rī́s
.pe6rī́6t2e
.per2ī́1t
.pe6r5ī́6ti2s
.perī́t2i
.pe6rī́6tō.
.perī́t2ō
.pe6rī́6tur
.pe6rī́6u
.pe6rī́6v
.pe4rí2e1
.pe1rí
.pe5rí1l
.per6í3mi1n
.perí1m2i
.pe6r5í6m2us
.per2ímu
.p2erí4n
.pe6r5í1ne
.p2e4r5í4q
.pe6r6í6re.
.per3í1r
.pe6rí6re1m
.pe6rí6ren
.per6ír2e1ne
.pe6r6í6re1q
.per6írer
.pe6rí6res
.pe6rí6r2e1t
.pe6r6í6re1u
.pe6r6í6re1v
.per6íri
.pe6rí2s1n2
.per2ís
.pe6rís3q
.pe6r5í2s1s2
.pe6r5íst2i
.perís3t
.pe6rís1u
.pe6rí2s1v
.pe6rí6tan
.per2í1t
.perít2a
.pe6rí6ta3q
.pe6rí6ta1u
.pe6rí6t2a1v
.pe6rí6t2e1
.pe6rí6ti2s
.perít2i
.pe6r5í2t1n
.pe6rí6to.
.perít2o
.pe6r5í2t1q
.pe6r5í2t1u2e1
.perí2tu
.pe6rítur
.pe6r5í2t1v
.p2e4rí4u2
.p2e4rí4v
.per5o4s
.per3ō
.pe4ró1r
.pe1ró
.pe4ró4s
.pē4nī
.p2ē
.p2ḗ3i
.pē2́
.pĕ4r3ā
.p2ĕ
.pĕ4r3ă2
.pĕ2r3ăs5
.pĕ6r5áe3q
.pĕ1r2á
.pĕr1æ4
.pĕr1ǣ4
.pĕr2ǣ2́4
.pĕr5ǣ́1q
.pĕ1rǽ4
.pĕ4r5ǽ1q
.p2ĕ4r5ē4
.pĕrē2́4
.pĕ4r3ĕ2ā
.p2ĕ1rĕ
.pĕ4r3ĕ2ă
.pĕ4r5ĕ2m
.pĕ4r5ĕ1ō
.pĕ6r5ĕ́4m
.pĕrĕ2́
.pĕ4rī.
.p2ĕ1rī
.pĕ6r5ī6m2ŭs
.pĕr2ī1m
.pĕrī1mŭ
.pĕ6r5ī6mŭ́s
.pĕrīm2ŭ́2
.pĕ2r5ī4n
.pĕ4r5ī4q
.pĕ6r5ī6rēm2ŭs
.pĕrī1r
.pĕrī1rē
.pĕrīrē1m
.pĕrīr2ē1mŭ
.pĕ6r5ī6rēmŭ́s
.pĕrīrēm2ŭ́2
.pĕ6r5ī6rēs
.pĕ6rī6r2ē1t
.pĕr5īrēt2ĭ
.pĕ6r5ī6rḗm2ŭs
.pĕrīrē2́
.pĕrīrḗ1m
.pĕrīrḗ1mŭ
